Utah statutes.
31A-37a-102.   Definitions.
(1)  For purposes of this chapter:
(a)  "Ceding insurer" means an insurer that:
(i)  is approved by the commissioner;
(ii)  is licensed or otherwise authorized to transact the business of
insurance or reinsurance in the insurer's state or country of domicile; and
(iii)  cedes risk to a special purpose financial captive insurance company
pursuant to a reinsurance contract.
(b)  Notwithstanding Section 31A-27a-102, "insolvency" or "insolvent" for
purposes of applying Chapter 27a, Insurer Receivership Act, to a special
purpose financial captive insurance company, means that a special purpose
financial captive insurance company:
(i)  is unable to pay an obligation when the obligation is due, unless the
obligation is the subject of a bona fide dispute; or
(ii)  fails to meet the criteria and conditions for solvency of the special
purpose financial captive insurance company established by the commissioner by
rule or order.
(c) (i)  "Insurance securitization" means a transaction or a group of related
transactions:
(A)  that may include a capital market offering;
(B)  that is effected through one or more related risk transfer instruments
and facilitating administrative agreements;
(C)  where all or part of the result of the transaction or group of related
transactions is used to fund the special purpose financial captive insurance
company's obligations under a reinsurance contract with a ceding insurer;
(D)  by which:
(I)  proceeds are obtained by a special purpose financial captive insurance
company, directly or indirectly, through the issuance of one or more
securities by the special purpose financial captive insurance company or
another person; or
(II)  a person provides one or more letters of credit or other assets for the
benefit of the special purpose financial captive insurance company if the
commissioner authorizes the special purpose financial captive insurance
company to treat the letter of credit or asset as an admitted asset for
purposes of the special purpose financial captive insurance company's annual
report; and
(E)  if all or a part of the proceeds, a letter of credit, or asset described
in this Subsection (1)(c) is used to fund the special purpose financial
captive insurance company's obligations under a reinsurance contract with a
ceding insurer.
(ii)  "Insurance securitization" does not include the issuance of a letter of
credit for the benefit of the commissioner to satisfy all or part of the
special purpose financial captive insurance company's capital and surplus
requirements under Section 31A-37a-302.
(d)  "Management" means:
(i)  a board of directors of a special purpose financial captive insurance
company;
(ii)  a managing board of a special purpose financial captive insurance
company; or
(iii)  one or more individuals with the overall responsibility for the
management of the affairs of the special purpose financial captive insurance
company, including:
(A)  an officer elected or appointed to act on behalf of the special purpose
financial captive insurance company; or
(B)  an agent elected or appointed to act on behalf of the special purpose
financial captive insurance company.
(e)  "Organizational document" means:
(i)  in the case of a special purpose financial captive insurance company
formed as a stock corporation, the special purpose financial captive insurance
company's:
(A)  articles of incorporation; and
(B)  bylaws; and
(ii)  in the case of a special purpose financial captive insurance company
formed as a limited liability company, the special purpose financial captive
insurance company's:
(A)  articles of organization; and
(B)  operating agreement.
(f)  "Reinsurance contract" means a contract between a special purpose
financial captive insurance company and a ceding insurer pursuant to which the
special purpose financial captive insurance company agrees to provide
reinsurance to the ceding insurer for risks associated with the ceding
insurer's insurance or reinsurance business.
(g)  "Security" means:
(i)  a security as defined in Section 31A-1-301; or
(ii)  one or more of the following that the commissioner designates, by rule
or order, as a "security" for purposes of this chapter:
(A)  a debt obligation;
(B)  equity;
(C)  a surplus certificate;
(D)  a surplus note;
(E)  a funding agreement;
(F)  a derivative; or
(G)  another financial instrument.
(h)  "Special purpose financial captive insurance company" means a captive
insurance company has a certificate of authority under this chapter from the
commissioner to operate as a special purpose financial captive insurance
company pursuant to this chapter.
(i)  "Special purpose financial captive insurance company security" means:
(i)  a security issued by a special purpose financial captive insurance
company; or
(ii)  a security issued by a third party, the proceeds of which are obtained
directly or indirectly by a special purpose financial captive insurance
company.
(j)  "Surplus note" means an unsecured subordinated debt obligation that has
one or more characteristics that are consistent with paragraph 3 of the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners Statement of Statutory
Accounting Principals No. 41, as amended from time to time and as modified or
supplemented by rule or order of the commissioner.
(2)  The terms defined in Section 31A-37-102 shall have the same meaning for
purposes of this chapter.
